District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.11

Services and facilities.

If the Rent Administrator determines that the related services or related facilities supplied by a housing provider for a housing accommodation or for any rental unit in the housing accommodation are substantially increased or decreased, the Rent Administrator may increase or decrease the rent charged, as applicable, to reflect proportionally the value of the change in services or facilities.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 211, 32 DCR 3089
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 13(c), 33 DCR 7836
Aug. 5, 2006, D.C. Law 16-145, § 2(a), 53 DCR 4889
This section is referenced in § 42-3502.08 and § 42-3502.16.
1981 Ed., § 45-2521.
D.C. Law 16-145 substituted “rent charged” for “rent ceiling”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Rent Control Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-470, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6772).
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3502.01.